dev/apertium-swe.pre-saldo-swe.dix
<pardef n="s/on__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~on / ~onen / ~öner / ~önerna -->
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onen</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öner</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>önerna</l>    <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/onde__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~onde / ~onden / ~önder / ~önderna -->
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>      <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onden</l>     <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>önder</l>     <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>önderna</l>   <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ledam/ot__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ot / ~oten / ~öter / ~öterna -->
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oten</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öter</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öterna</l>    <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="mor/ot__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ot / ~oten / ~ötter / ~ötterna -->
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oten</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötter</l>     <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötterna</l>   <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/otter__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~otter / ~ottern / ~öttrar / ~öttrarna -->
  <e>       <p><l>otter</l>     <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ottern</l>    <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öttrar</l>    <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öttrarna</l>  <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fakt/um__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~um / ~umet | (~um) / ~um | (~a) / ~men | (~a) -->
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="laboratori/um__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~um / ~et / ~er / ~erna -->
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mini/mum__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~um / ~et / ~er / ~erna -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>mum</l>        <r>mum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mumet</l>        <r>mum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>met</l>        <r>mum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mum</l>        <r>mum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>a</l>        <r>mum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mumen</l>      <r>mum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="heli/um__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~um / ~umet | (~et) | (~um) / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="l/us__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~us / ~usen / ~öss / ~össen -->
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öss</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>össen</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="film__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ras__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl">
<!-- PT
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
-->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ledamot">         <i>ledam</i><par n="ledam/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="film">            <i>film</i><par n="film__n"/></e>
<e lm="miljon">          <i>miljon</i><par n="film__n"/></e>
<e lm="bonde">           <i>b</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="dotter">          <i>d</i><par n="d/otter__n"/></e>
<e lm="faktum">          <i>fakt</i><par n="fakt/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="husbonde">        <i>husb</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="laboratorium">    <i>laboratori</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="magnesium">       <i>magnesi</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="natrium">         <i>natri</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="litium">          <i>liti</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kadmium">         <i>kadmi</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kalcium">         <i>kalci</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kalium">          <i>kali</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="helium">          <i>heli</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="aluminium">       <i>alumini</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="centrum">         <i>centr</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="masscentrum">     <i>masscentr</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="spektrum">        <i>spektr</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="minimum" a="PT">         <i>mini</i><par n="mini/mum__n"/></e>
<e lm="mus">             <i>m</i><par n="l/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="museum">          <i>muse</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="ras" a="PT">             <i>ras</i><par n="ras__n"/></e>
<e lm="rot">             <i>r</i><par n="mor/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="sanatorium">      <i>sanatori</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="son">             <i>s</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="sondotter">       <i>sond</i><par n="d/otter__n"/></e>
<e lm="sonson">          <i>sons</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="studium">         <i>studi</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="decennium">       <i>decenni</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="fot">             <i>f</i><par n="mor/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="stadium" a="is">  <i>stadi</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="privilegium" a="is"><i>privilegi</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="presidium" a="is"><i>presidi</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="moratorium" a="is"><i>moratori</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="territorium" a="is"><i>territori</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="seminarium" a="is"><i>seminari</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kommissionsledamot" a="is"><i>kommissionsledam</i><par n="ledam/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="kriterium" a="is"><i>kriteri</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="parlamentsledamot" a="is"><i>parlamentsledam</i><par n="ledam/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="prästson" a="is"> <i>prästs</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="riksdagsledamot" a="is"><i>riksdagsledam</i><par n="ledam/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="svärson" a="is">  <i>svärs</i><par n="s/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="bot" a="is">      <i>b</i><par n="ledam/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="deuterium" a="is"><i>deuteri</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="gymnasium" a="is"><i>gymnasi</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="maximum" a="PT">  <i>maxi</i><par n="mini/mum__n"/></e>
<e lm="ministerium" a="is"><i>ministeri</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="mysterium" a="is"><i>mysteri</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="arrowrot" a="SALDO">        <i>arrowr</i><par n="mor/ot__n"/></e>
